Utah statutes.
32B-6-503.   Commission's power to issue airport lounge license.

(1)  Before a person may store, sell, offer for sale, furnish, or allow the consumption of an alcoholic product on its premises as an airport lounge licensee, the person shall first obtain an airport lounge license from the commission in accordance with this part.

(2)  The commission may issue an airport lounge license to establish airport lounge licensed premises beyond the security point at an international airport and in the numbers the commission considers proper for the storage, sale, offer for sale, furnishing, and consumption of an alcoholic product on licensed premises operated as an airport lounge.

(3) (a)  The commission may not issue a total number of airport lounge licenses for an international airport that at any time exceed one airport lounge license for each 2,500,000 of total passengers at the international airport.

(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (3)(a), the commission may not reduce the total number of airport lounge licenses unless:

(i)  the commission determines that the number of total passengers is reduced by more than 25% from the last day on which the commission determined the total number of airport lounge licenses allowed for that international airport under this Subsection (3); and

(ii)  the reduction can be accomplished without the international airport terminating a lease for an airport lounge before:

(A)  the expiration of the lease;

(B)  the airport lounge undergoes a change of ownership; or

(C)  the airport lounge ceases operations.

